North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-32.1 Uniform Limited Liability Company Act
10-32.1-82.
Foreign limited liability company — Transactions not constituting transacting business.

A foreign limited liability company shall not be considered to be transacting business in this state for the purposes of this chapter solely by reason of carrying on in this state any one or more of the following, including:

Maintaining or defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration proceeding, or effecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes;

Holding meetings of its managers, governors, or members or carrying on other activities concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of its securities, or appointing and maintaining trustees or depositories with relation to its securities;

Holding title to and managing real or personal property, or any interest therein, situated in this state, as executor of the will or administrator of the estate of any decedent, as trustee of any trust, or as guardian of any person or conservator of the estate of any person;

Making, participating in, or investing in loans or creating, as borrower or lender, or otherwise acquiring indebtedness or mortgages or other security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting its debts or enforcing any rights in property securing its debts; or

Conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of thirty days and not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of like nature.

For purposes of sections 10-32.1-72 through 10-32.1-85, the ownership in this state of income-producing real property or tangible personal property, other than property excluded under subsection 1, constitutes transacting business in this state.

This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign limited liability company to service of process, taxation, or regulation under law of this state other than this chapter.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-83.
Foreign limited liability company — Service of process on a foreign limited liability company.

Service of process on a foreign limited liability company must be as provided in section 10-01.1-13.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-84.
Foreign limited liability company — Effect of failure to have a certificate of authority.

A foreign limited liability company transacting business in this state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it has a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

The failure of a foreign limited liability company to have a certificate of authority to transact business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the company or prevent the company from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

A member, manager, or governor of a foreign limited liability company is not liable for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the company solely because the company transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority.

If a foreign limited liability company transacts business in this state without a certificate of authority or cancels its certificate of authority, then it appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process for rights of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

A foreign limited liability company that transacts business in this state without a valid certificate of authority is subject to a civil penalty, payable to the state, not to exceed five thousand dollars. Each governor or, in the absence of governors, each member or agent who authorizes, directs, or participates in the transaction of business in this state on behalf of a foreign limited liability company that does not have a certificate is subject to a civil penalty, payable to the state, not to exceed one thousand dollars.

The civil penalties set forth in subsection 5 may be recovered in an action brought within the district court of Burleigh County by the attorney general. Upon a finding by the court that a foreign limited liability company or any of its members, governors, or agents have transacted business in this state in violation of this chapter, the court shall issue, in addition to the imposition of a civil penalty, an injunction restraining the further transaction of the business of the foreign limited liability company and the further exercise of the rights and privileges of the foreign limited liability company in this state. The foreign limited liability company must be enjoined from transacting business in this state until all civil penalties plus any interest and court costs that the court may assess have been paid and until the foreign limited liability company has otherwise complied with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-85.
Secretary of state — Powers — Enforcement.

The secretary of state has the power and authority reasonably necessary to efficiently administer this chapter and to perform the duties imposed thereby.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the secretary of state may propound to any limited liability company, domestic or foreign, and to any manager, governor, or member thereof, such interrogatories as may be reasonably necessary and proper to ascertain whether the limited liability company has complied with all provisions of this chapter which are applicable to the limited liability company, the manager, the governor, or the member.

The interrogatories must be answered within thirty days after mailing or within any additional time as may be fixed by the secretary of state. The answers to such interrogatories must be full and complete and must be made in writing and under oath.

If the interrogatories are directed:

To an individual, then they must be answered by that individual; or

To a limited liability company, then they must be answered by the persons whom the management and conduct of the activities of the company are vested pursuant to section 10-32.1-39.

The secretary of state need not file any record to which such interrogatories relate until such interrogatories have been answered, and not then if the answers disclose that such record is not in conformity with the provisions of this chapter.

The secretary of state shall certify to the attorney general, for such action as the attorney general may deem appropriate, all interrogatories and answers thereto, which disclose a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

Each person who fails or refuses within the time provided by subdivision a of subsection 2 to answer truthfully and fully all interrogatories propounded to that person by the secretary of state is guilty of an infraction.

Interrogatories propounded by the secretary of state and the answers thereto are not open to public inspection. The secretary of state may not disclose any facts or information obtained from the interrogatories or answers except insofar as may be permitted by law or insofar as is required for evidence in any criminal proceedings or other action by this state.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-86.
Secretary of state — Filing of records with secretary of state — Effective date.

A record authorized or required to be filed with the secretary of state under this chapter must be captioned to describe the purpose of the record, be in a medium permitted by the secretary of state, and be delivered to the secretary of state. If the filing fees required by section 10-32.1-92 have been paid, then, unless the secretary of state determines that a record does not comply with the filing requirements of this chapter, the secretary of state shall file the record and for all records, except annual reports, send an image of the filed record to the person who filed the record.

Upon request and payment of the fee provided in section 10-32.1-92, the secretary of state shall send to the requester a certified copy of a requested record.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a record filed with the secretary of state under this chapter may specify a delayed effective date which must be no later than ninety days from the date of filing. Subject to section 10-32.1-18, subdivision a of subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-20, and section 10-32.1-87, if the record does not specify a delayed effective date, then a record filed with the secretary of state is effective on the date the record is filed as evidenced by the endorsement of the secretary of state of the date on the record.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-87.
Secretary of state — Liability for inaccurate information in a filed record.

If a record filed with the secretary of state under this chapter contains inaccurate information, then a person that suffers a loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from:

A person that signed the record, or caused another to sign it on behalf of the person, and knew the information to be inaccurate at the time the record was signed; and

Subject to subsection 2, a member of a member-managed limited liability company or the manager of a manager-managed limited liability company, if:

The record was filed with the secretary of state on behalf of the company; and

The member or manager had notice of the inaccuracy for a reasonably sufficient time before the information was relied upon so that, before the reliance, the member or manager reasonably could have:

Effected an amendment under section 10-32.1-21;

Filed a petition under section 10-32.1-22; or

Filed a statement of correction under section 10-32.1-88.

To the extent that the operating agreement of a member-managed limited liability company expressly relieves a member of responsibility for maintaining the accuracy of information contained in records filed with the secretary of state under this chapter and imposes that responsibility on one or more other members, the liability stated in subdivision b of subsection 1, applies to those other members and not to the member that the operating agreement relieves of the responsibility.

An individual who signs a record authorized or required to be filed under this chapter affirms under penalty of perjury that the information stated in the record is accurate.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-88.
Secretary of state — Correcting a filed record.

Whenever a record authorized by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state has been filed and inaccurately records the action referred to in the record, contains an inaccurate or erroneous statement, or was defectively or erroneously signed, sealed, acknowledged, or verified, then the record may be corrected by filing a statement of correction.

A statement of correction:

Must:

Be signed by:

The person that signed the original record; or

By a person authorized to sign on behalf of that person;

Set forth the name of the limited liability company that filed the record;

Identify the record to be corrected by description and by the date of its filing with the secretary of state;

Identify the inaccuracy, error, or defect to be corrected; and

Set forth a statement in corrected form of the portion of the record to be corrected.

May not revoke or nullify the filed record.

The statement of correction must be filed with the secretary of state.

With respect to the effective date of correction:

A certificate issued by the secretary of state before a record is corrected, with respect to the effect of filing the original record, is considered to be applicable to the record as corrected as of the date the record as corrected is considered to have been filed under this subsection.

After a statement of correction has been filed with the secretary of state, the original record as corrected is considered to have been filed:

On the date the statement of correction was filed:

As to persons adversely affected by the correction; and

For the purposes of subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-04; and

On the date the original record was filed as to all other persons and for all other purposes.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-89.
Secretary of state — Annual report to the secretary of state.

Each limited liability company, and each foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state, shall file, within the time provided by subsection 3, an annual report setting forth:

The name of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company and the state or country under the laws of which it is organized.

The address of the registered office of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company in this state, the name of its registered agent in this state at that address, and the address of its principal executive office.

A brief statement of the character of the business in which the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company is actually engaged in this state.

The names and respective addresses of the managers and governors of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company or the name or names and respective address or addresses of the managing member or members of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company.

The annual report must be submitted on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. The information provided must be given as of the date of the execution of the report. The annual report must be signed as provided in subsection 49 of section 10-32.1-02, the articles, the bylaws, or a resolution approved by the affirmative vote of the required proportion or number of the governors or members entitled to vote. If the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, then the annual report must be signed on behalf of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company by the receiver or trustee. The secretary of state may destroy any annual report provided for in this section after the annual report is on file for six years.

Except for the first annual report, the annual report of a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company must be delivered to the secretary of state before November sixteenth of each year. The first annual report of a limited liability company must be delivered before November sixteenth in the year following the calendar year of the effective date stated in the articles of organization, and the first annual report of a foreign limited liability company must be delivered before November sixteenth of the year following the calendar year in which the certificate of authority was issued by the secretary of state. The secretary of state must file the report if the report conforms to the requirements of subsections 1 and 2.

If the report does not conform, then it must be returned to the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company for any necessary corrections.

If the report is filed before the deadlines provided in this subsection, then penalties for the failure to file a report within the time provided do not apply if the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of subsections 1 and 2 and returned to the secretary of state within thirty days after the annual report was returned by the secretary of state for correction.

After the date established under subsection 3, the secretary of state shall notify any limited liability company or foreign limited liability company failing to file its annual report that its certificate of organization or certificate of authority is not in good standing and that it may be terminated or revoked pursuant to section 10-32.1-90.

A limited liability company that was terminated for failure to file an annual report, or a foreign limited liability company whose authority was forfeited by failure to file an annual report, may be reinstated pursuant to section 10-32.1-91.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 92, § 9, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 85, § 11, effective August 1, 2021.

10-32.1-90.
Secretary of state — Involuntary termination — Revocation of certificate of authority.

With respect to the involuntary termination of a limited liability company by the secretary of state:

A limited liability company may be involuntarily terminated by the secretary of state if:

The limited liability company has failed to:

File with the secretary of state its annual report or any other record required to be filed with the secretary of state under this chapter together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92;

Appoint and maintain a registered agent and registered office as provided in chapter 10-01.1.

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the limited liability company pursuant to this chapter.

A limited liability company that fails to file its annual report, together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92, within six months after the date established in subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-89 ceases to exist and is considered involuntarily terminated by operation of law.

The secretary of state shall note the termination of the certificate of organization of the limited liability company on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the terminated limited liability company.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the last registered agent of the limited liability company at the last registered office in this state or, if the limited liability company fails to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state, then mailed to the principal executive office.

The decision of the secretary of state that the limited liability company has been involuntarily terminated under this subsection is final.

A limited liability company that was terminated for failure to file an annual report may be reinstated as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-91 and may appeal as provided in subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-91.

Except for termination of a limited liability company for failure to file the annual report as provided in section 10-32.1-89, no limited liability company may be terminated by the secretary of state unless:

The secretary of state has given the limited liability company not less that sixty days notice by mail addressed to the registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the limited liability company fails to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state, then addressed to its principal executive office; and

During the sixty-day period, the limited liability company has failed to:

File the report of change as provided in chapter 10-01.1 regarding the registered office or the registered agent;

File any other required record; or

Correct the misrepresentation.

Upon the expiration of sixty days after the mailing of the notice, the existence of the limited liability company is terminated. The secretary of state shall issue a notice of termination and shall mail the notice to the registered agent at the registered office in this state, or, if the limited liability company failed to appoint and maintain a registered agent or a registered office in this state, then addressed to the principal executive office of the limited liability company.

With respect to the revocation of a certificate of authority of a foreign limited liability company by the secretary of state:

The certificate of authority of a foreign limited liability company to transact business in this state may be revoked by the secretary of state if:

The foreign limited liability company has failed to:

File with the secretary of state its annual report or any other record required to be filed with the secretary of state under this chapter together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-77;

Appoint and maintain a registered agent and registered office as provided in chapter 10-01.1;

File with the secretary of state any amendment to its application for a certificate of authority as provided in section 10-32.1-77;

File with the secretary of state any merger as provided in section 10-32.1-79; or

File with the secretary of state an application for certificate of withdrawal of its authority as provided in section 10-32.1-81 when the existence of the limited liability company has expired or the limited liability company has been dissolved or terminated in the jurisdiction of the organization; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the foreign limited liability company pursuant to this chapter.

A foreign limited liability company that fails to file its annual report together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92, within six months after the date established by subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-89, forfeits the authority to transact business in this state and its certificate of authority is considered revoked by operation of law.

The secretary of state shall note the revocation of the certificate of authority of the foreign limited liability company on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the foreign limited liability company.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the last registered agent of the foreign limited liability company at its last registered office in this state or, if the foreign limited liability company fails to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state, then mailed to its principal executive office.

The decision of the secretary of state that a certificate of authority must be revoked under this subsection is final.

A foreign limited liability company whose authority was forfeited by, and whose certificate of authority was revoked by the secretary of state for, failure to file an annual report may be reinstated as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-91 and may appeal as provided in subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-91.

Except for revocation of the certificate of authority for failure to file the annual report as provided in section 10-32.1-89, no certificate of authority of a foreign limited liability company may be revoked by the secretary of state unless:

The secretary of state has given the foreign limited liability company not less than sixty days notice by mail addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the foreign limited liability company fails to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state, then addressed to the principal office; and

During the sixty-day period, the foreign limited liability company has failed to:

File the report of change as provided in chapter 10-01.1 regarding the registered office or registered agent;

File any merger;

File an application for withdrawal;

File any other required record; or

Correct the misrepresentation.

Upon the expiration of sixty days after the mailing of the notice, the authority of the foreign limited liability company to transact business in this state ceases. The secretary of state shall issue a notice of revocation and shall mail the notice to the registered agent at the registered office in this state, or, if the foreign limited liability company failed to appoint and maintain a registered agent or a registered office in this state, then addressed to the principal executive office of the foreign limited liability company.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-91.
Secretary of state — Reinstatement following an involuntary termination or revocation of authority — Appeals.

With respect to reinstatement following involuntary termination or revocation of authority:

A limited liability company that was terminated for failure to file an annual report, or a foreign limited liability company whose authority was revoked for failure to file an annual report, may be reinstated by filing a past-due report, together with the statutory filing and penalty fees for an annual report and a reinstatement fee as provided in section 10-32.1-92. The fees must be paid and the report filed within one year following the involuntary termination or revocation.

With respect to a reinstatement which is more than one year after involuntary termination or revocation:

If the secretary of state terminates a limited liability company or revokes the certificate of authority to transact business in this state of any foreign limited liability company, pursuant to the provisions of section 10-32.1-90, then the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company may appeal to district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County for reinstatement by filing with the clerk of such court a petition, including:

A copy of the articles of organization of the limited liability company and a copy of the notice of termination given by the secretary of state; or

A copy of the certificate of authority of the foreign limited liability company to transact business in this state and a copy of the notice of revocation given by the secretary of state. The matter must be tried de novo by the court. The court shall either sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take such action as the court may deem proper.

If the court order sought is one for reinstatement of a limited liability company that has been terminated as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-90, or for reinstatement of the certificate of authority of a foreign limited liability company that has been revoked as provided in subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-90, then, together with any other actions the court deems proper, any order which reverses the decision of the secretary of state shall require the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company to:

File the most recent past-due annual report;

Pay the fees to the secretary of state for all past-due annual reports as provided in subsection 25 of section 10-32.1-92; and

Pay the reinstatement fee to the secretary of state as provided in subsection 25 of section 10-32.1-92.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by the district court under this section in review of any ruling or decision of the secretary of state may be taken as in other civil actions.

Reinstatement returns the limited liability company to active status:

As of the date of the reinstatement:

In the office of the secretary of state;

As to persons adversely affected by the reinstatement; and

For purposes of subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-04; and

As of the date of the involuntary termination or revocation:

Validates contracts or other acts within the authority of the articles, and the limited liability company is liable for those contracts or acts; and

Restores to the limited liability company all assets and rights of the limited liability company and its members to the extent they were held by the limited liability company and its members before the involuntary dissolution or revocation occurred, except to the extent that assets or rights were affected by acts occurring after the involuntary dissolution or revocation, sold, or otherwise distributed after that time.

Reapplication for any license or permit by a reinstated limited liability company shall be pursuant to the North Dakota statute governing the issuance of the license or permit.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments by the district court under this subsection may be taken as in other civil actions.

With respect to appeals of the rejection by the secretary of state of any record required to be approved by the secretary of state before the record may be filed:

The secretary of state shall give written notice of the rejection to the person that delivered the record, specifying the reasons for rejection.

Within thirty days after the service of the notice of denial, the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, as the case may be, may appeal to the district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of court a petition setting forth a copy of the record sought to be filed and a copy of the written rejection of the record of the secretary of state.

The matter must be tried de novo by the court.

The court shall either sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take such action as the court may deem proper.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments by the district court under this subsection may be taken as in other civil actions.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-92.
Secretary of state — Fees and charges.
[Contingent effective date – See note]

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for:

Filing articles of organization and issuing a certificate of organization, one hundred thirty-five dollars.

Filing articles of amendment, fifty dollars.

Filing statement of correction, fifty dollars.

Filing restated articles of organization, one hundred twenty-five dollars.

Filing a statement of authority or a statement amending or canceling the statement of authority of a limited liability company, twenty dollars.

Filing articles of conversion of a limited liability company, fifty dollars and:

If the organization resulting from the conversion will be a domestic organization governed by the laws of this state, then the fees provided by the governing laws to establish or register a new organization like the organization resulting from the conversion; or

If the organization resulting from the conversion will be a foreign organization that will transact business in this state, then the fees provided by the governing laws to obtain a certificate of authority or register an organization like the organization resulting from the conversion.

Filing abandonment of conversion, fifty dollars.

Articles of domestication, fifty dollars and:

If the organization resulting from the domestication will be a domestic organization governed by the laws of this state, then the fees provided by the governing laws to establish or register a new organization like the organization resulting from the domestication; or

If the organization resulting from the domestication will be a foreign organization that will transact business in this state, then the fees provided by the governing laws to obtain a certificate of authority or register an organization like the organization resulting from the domestication.

Filing articles of merger or exchange and issuing a certificate of merger or exchange, fifty dollars.

Filing abandonment of merger or exchange, fifty dollars.

Filing an application to reserve a name, ten dollars.

Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved name, ten dollars.

Filing a cancellation of reserved name, ten dollars.

Filing a consent to use a name, ten dollars.

Filing a statement of change of address of registered office or change of registered agent or both, or a statement of change of address of registered office by registered agent, the fee provided in section 10-01.1-03.

Filing a resolution for the establishment of a class or series of membership interests, fifty dollars.

Filing a notice of dissolution, ten dollars.

Filing a statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings, ten dollars.

Filing articles of dissolution and termination, twenty dollars.

Filing an application of a foreign limited liability company for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state and issuing a certificate of authority, one hundred thirty-five dollars.

Filing an amendment to the certificate of authority by a foreign limited liability company, fifty dollars.

Filing a certificate of fact stating a merger of a foreign limited liability company holding a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, fifty dollars.

Filing a certified statement of conversion of a foreign limited liability company, fifty dollars.

Filing an application for withdrawal of a foreign limited liability company and issuing a certificate of withdrawal, twenty dollars.

Filing an annual report of a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, fifty dollars.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect additional fees for late filing of the annual report as follows:

After the date provided in subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-89, fifty dollars; and

After the termination of the limited liability company, or the revocation of the certificate of authority of a foreign limited liability company, the reinstatement fee of one hundred thirty-five dollars.

Fees paid to the secretary of state according to this subsection are not refundable if an annual report submitted to the secretary of state cannot be filed because it lacks information required by section 10-32.1-89, or the annual report lacks sufficient payment as required by this subsection.

Filing any process, notice, or demand for service, the fee provided in section 10-01.1-03.

Submitting any record for approval before the actual time of submission for filing, one-half of the fee provided in this section for filing the record.

Filing any other statement or report of a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, ten dollars.

Furnishing a copy of any record, or paper relating to a limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company:

The fee provided in section 54-09-04 for copying a record; and

Five dollars for a search of records.

Furnishing a certificate of good standing, existence, or authorization:

Fifteen dollars; and

Five dollars for a search of records.

History.

Contingently enacted by S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015; contingently amended by 2019, ch. 93, § 4.

Note.

This section is effective upon receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the secretary of state attesting that all necessary administrative rules and information technology components and systems are ready for implementation of this Act.

10-32.1-93.
Secretary of state — Certificate of existence and authorization.

The secretary of state, upon request, compliance with subsection 2 and payment of the fee required by section 10-32.1-92, shall furnish to any person a certificate of existence for:

A limited liability company that exists; or

A foreign limited liability company that has an active certificate of authority.

The limited liability company or foreign limited liability company for which a certificate of existence is requested must have:

Filed all annual reports; and

Paid all fees due to the secretary of state.

Any certificate furnished by the secretary of state under this section may be created and furnished as an electronic record with the same force and effect as if produced in a paper form.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-94.
Secretary of state — Certificates and certified copies to be received in evidence.

All certificates issued by the secretary of state and all copies of records filed in accordance with this chapter, when certified by the secretary of state, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the facts therein stated.

A certificate by the secretary of state under the great seal of this state, as to the existence or nonexistence of the facts relating to limited liability companies which would not appear from a certified copy of any of the foregoing records or certificates, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the existence or nonexistence of the facts stated therein.

Any certificate or certified copy issued by the secretary of state under this section may be created and disseminated as an electronic record with the same force and effect as if produced in a paper form.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-95.
Secretary of state — Confidential records.

Any social security number or federal tax identification number disclosed or contained in any record filed with the secretary of state under this chapter is confidential. The secretary of state shall delete or obscure any social security number or federal tax identification number before a copy of any record is released to the public.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-96.
Secretary of state — Forms.

All annual reports required by this chapter to be filed in the office of the secretary of state must be made on forms prescribed by the secretary of state. Forms for all other records to be filed in the office of the secretary of state may be furnished by the secretary of state upon request. However, the use of such forms, unless otherwise specifically required by law, is not mandatory.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-97.
Attorney general — State interested in a proceeding.

If it appears at any stage of a proceeding in a court in this state that the state is, or is likely to be, interested in the proceeding or that it is a matter of general public interest, then the court shall order that a copy of the complaint or petition be served upon the attorney general in the same manner prescribed for serving a summons in a civil action. The attorney general shall intervene in a proceeding when the attorney general determines that the public interest requires it, whether or not the attorney general has been served.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-98.
Attorney general — Action by the attorney general.

A limited liability company may be involuntarily dissolved, wound up, and terminated by a decree of a court in this state in an action filed by the attorney general when it is established that:

The articles of organization were procured through fraud;

The limited liability company was organized for a purpose not permitted by this chapter;

The limited liability company failed to comply with the requirements essential to organization under this chapter;

The limited liability company has flagrantly violated a provision of this chapter, has violated a provision of this chapter more than once, or has violated more than one provision of this chapter; or

The limited liability company has acted, or failed to act, in a manner that constitutes surrender or abandonment of the limited liability company privileges or enterprise.

The attorney general may bring an action to enjoin a foreign limited liability company from transacting business in this state in violation of this chapter.

An action must not be commenced under this section until thirty days after notice to the limited liability company by the attorney general of the reason for the filing of the action. If the reason for filing the action is an act that the limited liability company has done, or omitted to do, and the act or omission may be corrected by an amendment of the articles of organization, a member control agreement, or the bylaws or by performance of or abstention from the act, then the attorney general shall give the limited liability company thirty additional days in which to effect the correction before filing the action.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-99.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.